North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-52 Public Employees Retirement System
54-52-19.1.
Continuance of prior service benefits earned under former plan.

Any retired employee receiving prior service benefits under former section 54-52-19 is entitled to continue to receive those benefits. For the purposes of this section only, section 54-52-19 is deemed to remain in effect. The amount of benefits to which the employee is entitled is double that computed under original section 54-52-19.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 499, § 15; 1987, ch. 655, § 1.

54-52-19.2.
Grant of prior service credit after refund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 531, § 19.

54-52-20.
Prior service — Register — Benefits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 499, § 17.

54-52-21.
Plan not employment contract.

The adoption of or participation in a retirement plan may not be deemed to give an employee the right to be retained in the employ of a governmental unit or to interfere with the right of the governmental unit to discharge any employee at any time.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 21; 1977, ch. 499, § 16.

54-52-22.
Interpretation clause.

This chapter may not be construed so as to commit the state of North Dakota, or any county, city, or school district or the agency to any liability either moral or legal for any benefits to any beneficiary under the plan or plans resulting from enactment of this chapter, nor as exemption from any regulatory laws of the state of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 22; 1967, ch. 395, § 5; 1969, ch. 456, § 12; 1969, ch. 457, § 11.

54-52-23.
Savings clause — Plan modifications.

If the board determines that any section of this chapter does not comply with applicable federal statutes or rules, the board shall adopt appropriate terminology with respect to that section as will comply with those federal statutes or rules, subject to the approval of the employee benefits programs committee. Any plan modifications made by the board pursuant to this section are effective until the effective date of any measure enacted by the legislative assembly providing the necessary amendments to this chapter to ensure compliance with the federal statutes or rules.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 361, § 23; 1991, ch. 630, § 8; 2013, ch. 432, § 5.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 432, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

54-52-24.
Planning and organizing funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 456, § 13; S.L. 1969, ch. 457, § 12.

54-52-25.
Limitation of powers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 667, § 13.

54-52-26.
Confidentiality of records.

All records relating to the retirement benefits of a member or a beneficiary under this chapter, chapter 54-52.2, and chapter 54-52.6 are confidential and are not public records. Information and records may be disclosed, under rules adopted by the board, only to:

A person to whom the member has given written consent to have the information disclosed.

A person legally representing the member, upon proper proof of representation, and unless the member specifically withholds consent.

A person authorized by a court order.

A member’s participating employer, limited to information concerning the member’s years of service credit and years of age. The board may share other types of information as needed by the employer to validate the employer’s compliance with existing state or federal laws. Any information provided to the member’s participating employer under this subsection must remain confidential except as provided under subsection 6.

The administrative staff of the retirement and investment office for purposes relating to membership and benefits determination.

State or federal agencies for purposes of reporting on a service provider’s provision of services or when the employer must supply information to an agency to validate the employer’s compliance with existing state or federal laws.

Member interest groups approved by the board on a third-party blind list basis, limited to information concerning the member’s participation, name, and address.

The member’s spouse or former spouse, that individual’s legal representative, and the judge presiding over the member’s dissolution proceeding for purposes of aiding the parties in drafting a qualified domestic relations order under section 54-52-17.6. The information disclosed under this subsection must be limited to information necessary for drafting the order.

Beneficiaries designated by a participating member or a former participating member to receive benefits after the member’s death, but only after the member’s death. Information relating to beneficiaries may be disclosed to other beneficiaries of the same member.

The general public, but only after the board has been unable to locate the member for a period in excess of one year, and limited to the member’s name and the fact the board has been unable to locate the member.

Any person if the board determines disclosure is necessary for treatment, operational, or payment purposes, including the completion of necessary documents.

A government child support enforcement agency for purposes of establishing paternity or establishing, modifying, or enforcing a child support obligation of the member.

A person if the information relates to an employer service purchase, but the information must be limited to the member’s name and employer, the retirement program in which the member participates, the amount of service credit purchased by the employer, and the total amount expended by the employer for that service credit purchase, and that information may only be obtained from the member’s employer.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 224, § 3; 1993, ch. 532, § 7; 1997, ch. 464, § 5; 1999, ch. 482, § 3; 2001, ch. 494, § 7; 2003, ch. 498, § 14; 2005, ch. 415, § 22; 2007, ch. 482, § 9; 2021, ch. 439, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

54-52-27.
Purchase of sick leave credit.

A member is entitled to credit in the retirement system for each month of unused sick leave, as certified by the member’s employer, if the member or the member’s employer pays an amount equal to the member’s final average salary, times the number of months of sick leave converted, times the percent of employer and employee contributions to the retirement program of the member, plus the required contribution for the retiree health benefits program. Hours of sick leave equal to a fraction of a month are deemed to be a full month for purposes of conversion to service credit. A member may convert all of the member’s certified sick leave or a part of the member’s certified sick leave.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 531, § 3; 1997, ch. 464, § 6; 2003, ch. 498, § 15; 2007, ch. 482, § 10; 2009, ch. 513, § 2; 2011, ch. 431, § 8.

54-52-28.
Internal Revenue Code compliance.

The board shall administer the plan in compliance with the following sections of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, as it applies for governmental plans.

Section 415, including the defined benefit dollar limitation under section 415(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The defined benefit dollar limitation under section 415(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, as approved by the legislative assembly, must be adjusted under section 415(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, effective January first of each year following a regular legislative session. The adjustment of the defined benefit dollar limitation under section 415(d) applies to participating members who have had a separation from employment, but that member’s benefit payments may not reflect the adjusted limit prior to January first of the calendar year in which the adjustment applies.

If a participating member’s benefit is increased by plan amendment after the commencement of benefit payments, the member’s annual benefit may not exceed the defined benefit dollar limitation under section 415(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted under section 415(d) for the calendar year in which the increased benefit is payable.

If a participating member is, or ever has been, a participant in another defined benefit plan maintained by the employer, the sum of the participant’s annual benefits from all the plans may not exceed the defined benefit dollar limitation under section 415(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code. If the participating member’s employer-provided benefits under all such defined benefit plans would exceed the defined benefit dollar limitation, the benefit must be reduced to comply with section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code. The reduction must be made pro rata between the plans, in proportion to the participating member’s service in each plan.

The minimum distribution rules under section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, including the incidental death benefit requirements under section 401(a)(9)(G), and the regulations issued under that provision to the extent applicable to governmental plans. Accordingly, benefits must be distributed or begin to be distributed no later than a member’s required beginning date, and the required minimum distribution rules override any inconsistent provision of this chapter. For a member who attains age seventy and one-half before January 1, 2020, the member’s required beginning date is April first of the calendar year following the later of the calendar year in which the member attains age seventy and one-half or terminates employment. For a member who attains age seventy and one-half after December 31, 2019, the member’s required beginning date is April first of the calendar year following the later of the calendar year in which the member attains age seventy-two or terminates employment.

The annual compensation limitation under section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code, as adjusted for cost-of-living increases under section 401(a)(17)(B).

The rollover rules under section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code. Accordingly, a distributee may elect to have an eligible rollover distribution, as defined in section 402(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, paid in a direct rollover to an eligible retirement plan, as defined in section 402(c)(8)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, specified by the distributee. For purposes of this section, “distributee” includes a beneficiary, other than a spouse, of a deceased member, provided however, in the case of a beneficiary other than a spouse, the direct rollover may be made only to an individual retirement account or individual retirement annuity described in section 408 or 408A of the Internal Revenue Code which is established on behalf of the beneficiary and will be treated as an inherited individual retirement account or individual retirement annuity under section 402(c)(11) of the Internal Revenue Code.

If the plan of retirement benefits set forth in this chapter is terminated or discontinued, the rights of all affected participating members to accrued retirement benefits under this chapter as of the date of termination or discontinuance is nonforfeitable, to the extent then funded.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 498, § 12; 2005, ch. 531, § 13; 2007, ch. 482, § 11; 2009, ch. 514, § 11; 2011, ch. 431, § 9; 2013, ch. 432, § 6; 2015, ch. 259, § 9, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 372, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 439, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 432, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

54-52-29.
Employer service purchases.

A participating employer may purchase additional service credit on behalf of a member under the following conditions:

The member may not be given the option to choose between an employer service purchase and an equivalent amount paid in cash.

The member must meet one of the following conditions at the time the purchase is made:

The member’s age plus service credit must be equal to or greater than seventy-five; or

The member’s age must be at least fifty-five and the member must have at least three years of service credit.

The board must determine the purchase price on an actuarially equivalent basis, taking into account the contributions necessary for both the retirement program and the retiree health benefits fund.

The purchase must be completed before the member’s retirement.

The employer may purchase a maximum of five years of service credit on behalf of the member.

The employer must pay the purchase price for the service credit purchased under this section in a lump sum.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 498, § 13; 2007, ch. 482, § 12.